hu: Rendszámtábla-burkolat típusa: Csavartakaró készlet; Buborékos burkolat; Lapos burkolat; Teljes burkolat (első); Teljes burkolat (hátsó); Csuklópántos burkolat; Párban (első és hátsó); Csavarkupak készlet; Lopásgátló csavarkupakok; Egyéb
cs: Provedení krytu na registrační značku: Sada krytek šroubů; Vypouklý kryt; Plochý kryt; Kompletní kryt (přední); Kompletní kryt (zadní); Odklápěcí kryt; Pár (přední a zadní); Sada krytek na šrouby; Krytky na šrouby s ochranou proti krádeži; Jiné
lt-LT: Valstybinio numerio rėmelio stilius: Varžtų dangtelių rinkinys; Išgaubtas dangtelis; Plokščias dangtelis; Visiškai dengiantis (priekinis); Visiškai dengiantis (galinis); Atverčiamas dangtelis; Pora (priekinis ir galinis); Varžtų galvučių dangtelių rinkinys; Varžtų dangteliai su apsauga nuo vagystės; Kita
pt-BR: Capa de placa estilo: Conjunto de tampas de parafuso; Capa bolha; Capa plana; Capa completa (frente); Capa completa (traseira); Capa articulada; Par (frente e traseira); Conjunto de tampas de parafuso; Tampas de parafuso antifurto; Outro
sl-SI: Stil okvirja/prevleke za registrsko tablico: Komplet pokrovov za vijake; Izbočen pokrov; Ploski pokrov; Polni pokrov (spredaj); Polni pokrov (zadaj); Pokrov s tečaji; Par (spredaj in zadaj); Komplet navojnih pokrovčkov; Navojni pokrovčki z zaščito proti kraji; Drugo
tr: Plaka kapağı stili: Cıvata kapağı seti; Balon kapak; Düz kapak; Tam kapak (ön); Tam kapak (arka); Menteşeli kapak; Çift (ön ve arka); Vida kapağı seti; Hırsızlık caydırıcı vida kapakları; Diğer
sv: Typ av täckning för registreringsskylt: Set med bultskydd; Bubbelkupa; Platt skydd; Heltäckande skydd (fram); Heltäckande skydd (bak); Skydd med gångjärn; Par (fram och bak); Set med skruvlock; Skruvlock med stöldskydd; Övrigt
bg-BG: Стил на капака за регистрационния номер: Комплект капачки за болтове; Изпъкнал капак; Плосък капак; Пълен капак (преден); Пълен капак (заден); Капак с панта; Комплект (преден и заден); Комплект капачки за винтове; Капачки за винтове със защита против кражба; Друг
nl: Kentekenplaathoes stijl: Boutafdekset; Bolle afdekking; Platte afdekking; Volledige afdekking (voor); Volledige afdekking (achter); Scharnierende afdekking; Paar (voor en achter); Schroefdopset; Schroefdoppen met diefstalbeveiliging; Overig
es: Tipo de cubierta de la placa de identificación: Set de cubretornillos; Cubierta de burbuja; Cubierta plana; Cubierta completa (delantera); Cubierta completa (trasera); Cubierta con bisagras; Par (delantera y trasera); Set de tapas para tornillos; Tapas para tornillos antirrobo; Otro
zh-CN: 车牌框样式: 螺栓盖套装; 气泡盖; 平盖; 全盖（前）; 全盖（后）; 铰链盖; 一对（前与后）; 螺帽套装; 防盗螺帽; 其他
nb: Type nummerskiltdeksel: Boltedekselsett; Bobledeksel; Flatt deksel; Heldekkende deksel (foran); Heldekkende deksel (bak); Hengslet deksel; Par (foran og bak); Skruedekselsett; Skruedeksler med tyverisikring; Annet
fr: Type de protection pour plaque d’immatriculation: Ensemble de cache-boulons; Cache bombé; Cache plat; Cache intégral (avant); Cache intégral (arrière); Cache à charnière; Paire (avant et arrière); Ensemble de cache-vis; Cache-vis avec dispositif antivol; Autre
th: สไตล์ฝาครอบป้ายทะเบียน: ชุดฝาครอบน็อต; ฝาครอบแบบนูน; ฝาครอบแบบแบน; ฝาครอบเต็ม (ด้านหน้า); ฝาครอบเต็ม (ด้านหลัง); ฝาครอบแบบบานพับ; เป็นคู่ (หน้าและหลัง); ชุดฝาครอบสกรู; ฝาครอบสกรูพร้อมระบบกันขโมย; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Stil okvira registarske tablice: Komplet poklopaca za vijke; Ispupčeni okvir; Ravni okvir; Puni okvir (prednji); Puni okvir (stražnji); Okvir sa šarkama; Par (prednji i stražnji); Komplet čepova za vijke; Čepovi za vijke sa zaštitom od krađe; Ostalo
pt-PT: Estilo da capa da matrícula: Conjunto de tampas para parafusos; Cobertura convexa; Cobertura plana; Cobertura total (frente); Cobertura total (traseira); Cobertura com dobradiças; Par (frente e traseira); Conjunto de tampas de rosca; Tampas de rosca antirroubo; Outro
en: License plate cover style: Bolt cover set; Bubble cover; Flat cover; Full cover (front); Full cover (rear); Hinged cover; Pair (front & rear); Screw cap set; Screw caps with theft-deterrent; Other
da: Stilen for nummerpladerammen: Boltafdækningssæt; Bobleafdækning; Flad afdækning; Fuld afdækning (foran); Fuld afdækning (bagpå); Hængslet afdækning; Par (foran og bagpå); Skruelågssæt; Skruelåg med tyverisikring; Andet
it: Stile della cover per targa: Set di copribulloni; Copritarga a bolla; Copritarga piatto; Copritarga completo (anteriore); Copritarga completo (posteriore); Copritarga a cerniera; Coppia (anteriore e posteriore); Set di copriviti; Copriviti con sistema antifurto; Altro
zh-TW: 車牌蓋款式: 螺栓蓋組; 立體罩; 平板罩; 全罩 (前); 全罩 (後); 鉸鏈罩; 一對 (前後); 螺絲帽組; 防盜螺絲帽; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl krytu evidenčného čísla vozidla: Súprava krytov na skrutky; Bublinový kryt; Plochý kryt; Plný kryt (predný); Plný kryt (zadný); Výklopný kryt; Pár (predný a zadný); Súprava krytiek na skrutky; Krytky skrutiek s ochranou proti krádeži; Iné
pl: tabliczka informatyczna styl okładki: Zestaw osłon na śruby; Osłona wypukła (bubble); Osłona płaska; Pełna osłona (przód); Pełna osłona (tył); Osłona na zawiasach; Zestaw (przód i tył); Zestaw nakładek na śruby; Nakładki na śruby zabezpieczające przed kradzieżą; Inne
ro-RO: Stilul capacului pentru plăcii de identificare: Set capace pentru șuruburi; Capac cu bulă; Capac plat; Capac complet (față); Capac complet (spate); Capac cu balamale; Pereche (față și spate); Set de capace pentru șuruburi; Capace pentru șuruburi cu sistem antifurt; Altele
vi: Kiểu dáng vỏ biển số xe: Bộ nắp bu-lông; Ốp vòm; Ốp phẳng; Ốp toàn bộ (phía trước); Ốp toàn bộ (phía sau); Ốp có bản lề; Cặp (phía trước & phía sau); Bộ nắp ốc vít; Nắp ốc vít chống trộm; Khác
de: Stil der Kennzeichenabdeckung: Schraubenabdeckungs-Set; Bubble-Abdeckung; Flache Abdeckung; Vollständige Abdeckung (vorne); Vollständige Abdeckung (hinten); Klappabdeckung; Paar (vorne & hinten); Schraubkappen-Set; Schraubkappen mit Diebstahlschutz; Sonstige
ru: Стиль рамки номерного знака: Набор крышек для болтов; Объемная крышка; Плоская накладка; Полная накладка (передняя); Полная накладка (задняя); Откидная накладка; Комплект (передняя и задняя); Набор колпачков для винтов; Колпачки для винтов с защитой от кражи; Другое
fi: Rekisterikilven suojuksen tyyppi: Pultinsuojusten sarja; Kuplasuojus; Tasainen suojus; Täysi suojus (etu); Täysi suojus (taka); Saranoitu suojus; Pari (etu ja taka); Ruuvinsuojusten sarja; Varkaudenestoruuvinsuojukset; Muu
ja: ライセンスプレートカバースタイル: ボルトカバーセット; バブルカバー; フラットカバー; フルカバー (フロント); フルカバー (リア); ヒンジカバー; ペア (フロントとリア); スクリューキャップセット; 盗難防止スクリューキャップ; その他
ko: 번호판 커버 스타일: 볼트 커버 세트; 버블 커버; 평면 커버; 전체 커버(전면); 전체 커버(후면); 힌지 커버; 쌍(전면 및 후면); 나사 캡 세트; 도난 방지 기능 나사 캡; 기타
el: Στυλ καλύμματος πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας: Σετ καλυμμάτων βιδών; Κάλυμμα φούσκα (bubble cover); Επίπεδο κάλυμμα; Πλήρες κάλυμμα (μπροστινό); Πλήρες κάλυμμα (πίσω); Κάλυμμα με μεντεσέ; Ζεύγος (μπρος και πίσω); Σετ με καπάκια βιδών; Καπάκια βιδών με αντικλεπτική προστασία; Άλλο